Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.36.030

Constitutional measures—Ballot title—Filing.

The ballot title for a constitutional amendment or proposed constitution must be filed with the secretary of state in the same manner as the ballot title and summary for a state initiative or referendum are filed.

[ 2003 c 111 s 903. Prior: 2000 c 197 s 8. Formerly RCW 29.27.061.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2000 c 197: See note following RCW 29A.72.050.